Arkansas, session 2025, HB1688.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-14-1704 is amended to read as follows:
27-14-1704. Dealer's extra license plates.
(a) Each dealer as defined in § 27-14-601(a)(6) shall furnish the
Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration with a list of each
manager, sales manager, and salesperson user authorized under this section to
operate a motor vehicle one (1) or more new or used motor vehicles to which a
dealer's extra license plate issued to the dealer has been or will be
attached:
(1) Upon initial application for dealer's extra license plates
as provided in § 27-14-1702; and
(2) Upon renewal of dealer's extra license plates as provided in
§ 27-14-1703.
(b)(1) The dealer's extra license plate may be used only by the
dealer, manager, or salesperson and the owners, officers, managers, or
salespersons of the dealer and only for the following authorized purposes:
(1)(A) To drive to and from work;
(2)(B) For business or personal trips inside or outside
the dealer's county of residence;
*MBM086*
04-08-2025 10:54:18 MBM086

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 HB1688
(3)(C) To transport the vehicle; or
(4)(D) To demonstrate the vehicle;
(E) To drive the vehicle in community related events,
including without limitation parades, car shows, festivals, fairs, trade
shows, and school or university events; or
(F) To comply with a manufacturer's terms of dealership
sales and service agreements.
(2) "Manager" under subdivision (b)(1) of this section includes
without limitation a regional manager, a division manager, a department
manager, and a sales manager.
(c) Neither the dealer's extra license plate issued under this section
nor the dealer's master plate issued under § 27-14-601(a)(6) shall be used
for purposes of allowing a prospective buyer to test drive a vehicle unless
the dealer, manager, or salesperson or an owner, officer, manager, or
salesperson of the dealer is present in the vehicle.
(d) In addition to any other penalty prescribed by this chapter, any
dealer, manager, salesperson, or employee or owner, officer, manager, or
salesperson of a dealer who pleads guilty or nolo contendere to or who is
found guilty of the misuse of a dealer's extra license plate or dealer's
master plate or of allowing anyone else to misuse a dealer's extra license
plate or dealer's master plate shall be fined not more than two hundred fifty
dollars ($250) for the first offense, not more than five hundred dollars
($500) for the second offense, and not more than one thousand dollars
($1,000) for the third and subsequent offenses.
(e)(1)(A) In addition to any other penalty prescribed by this chapter,
the secretary may suspend some or all of the dealer's extra license plates
issued to a dealer if the secretary determines that the dealer or any
manager, sales manager, or salesperson or an owner, officer, manager, or
salesperson of the dealer either misused a dealer's extra license plate or
allowed the use of a dealer's extra license plate by a person who is not
authorized by this section to use a dealer's extra license plate.
(B) A suspension of the dealer's extra license plates
under this section does not require that the dealer's master license plate be
suspended.
(C) The secretary shall:
(i) Notify the dealer in writing of a suspension of
04-08-2025 10:54:18 MBM086

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 HB1688
the dealer's extra license plates that is authorized under this section; and
(ii) Provide information regarding the misuse or
unauthorized use upon which the suspension was based in the notice.
(D) The dealer's extra license plates shall be suspended
for:
(i) Six (6) months for the first misuse or
unauthorized use of the dealer's extra license plates; or
(ii) One (1) year for any subsequent misuse or
unauthorized use.
(2)(A) Any dealer who desires a hearing on the suspension shall
notify the secretary in writing within twenty (20) days after receipt of the
notice of suspension.
(B) A hearing officer appointed by the secretary shall
schedule a hearing in an office of the Revenue Division of the Department of
Finance and Administration in the county of the dealer's principal place of
business, unless the secretary and the dealer agree to another location for
the hearing or agree that the hearing shall be held by telephone.
(C) Hearings conducted under this section shall be subject
to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(D) The hearing officer shall render his or her decision
in writing to modify, reverse, or affirm the suspension of the dealer's extra
license plates based upon the evidence presented at the hearing and shall
serve a copy of the decision on the dealer.
(3)(A)(i) If the decision sustains, in whole or in part, the
suspension of the dealer's extra license plates, the dealer may file suit
within thirty (30) days of receipt of the decision in the Pulaski County
Circuit Court or the circuit court of the county of the dealer's principal
place of business.
(ii) The dealer shall serve a copy of the petition on
the secretary.
(iii) The appeal will not operate as a stay of the
order of suspension that will remain in effect and be terminated only in the
event a decision reversing the suspension is issued by the circuit court.
(B) An appeal from the circuit court shall be in
accordance with the laws governing appeals.
(f) Any and all uses of a new or used motor vehicle for sale to which
04-08-2025 10:54:18 MBM086

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 HB1688
a dealer's extra license plate has been attached, including without
limitation use by persons authorized under subdivision (b)(1) of this section
and use by persons not authorized under subdivision (b)(1) of this section,
shall not constitute a withdrawal from stock and are otherwise exempt from
the Arkansas gross receipts tax levied by the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of
1941, § 26-52-101 et seq., and the Arkansas compensating use tax levied by
the Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of 1949, § 26-53-101 et seq.

/s/Cavenaugh



























04-08-2025 10:54:18 MBM086